Utah statutes.
58-11a-301.   Licensure required -- License classifications.
(1)  Except as specifically provided in Section 58-1-307 or 58-11a-304, a
license is required to:
(a)  engage in the practice of:
(i)  barbering;
(ii)  barbering instruction;
(iii)  operating a barbering school;
(iv)  cosmetology/barbering;
(v)  cosmetology/barbering instruction; or
(vi)  electrology;
(b)  operate a cosmetology/barbering school;
(c)  engage in the practice of:
(i)  electrology instruction;
(ii)  esthetics;
(iii)  master-level esthetics;
(iv)  esthetics instruction;
(v)  nail technology; or
(vi)  nail technology instruction; or
(d)  operate:
(i)  an electrology school;
(ii)  an esthetics school; or
(iii)  a nail technology school.
(2)  The division shall issue to a person who qualifies under this chapter a
license in the following classifications:
(a)  barber;
(b)  barber instructor;
(c)  barber school;
(d)  cosmetologist/barber;
(e)  cosmetologist/barber instructor;
(f)  cosmetology/barber school;
(g)  electrologist;
(h)  electrologist instructor;
(i)  electrology school;
(j)  esthetician;
(k)  master esthetician;
(l)  esthetician instructor;
(m)  esthetics school;
(n)  nail technology;
(o)  nail technology instructor; and
(p)  nail technology school.
